Hawaii statutes.
[§346-367] Determination of eligibility and
need. (a) The provider agency operating and managing a homeless facility
or any other program for the homeless authorized by this part, or the department
operating and managing its own homeless facility, shall be responsible for
determining if an applicant is eligible for shelter or other services at the
homeless facility or through any other program for the homeless, pursuant to
standards and criteria established by rule.

(b) The provider agency or the department
operating and managing its own homeless facility shall determine the degree of
need for each homeless family or individual and, in its determination, shall
consider the resources available and the number of potential eligible
applicants in the area served by the homeless facility or other program for the
homeless authorized by this part.

(c) The department may establish by rule
standards and criteria for eligibility, need, and priority for each program;
provided that the department may establish by rule exceptions to these
eligibility requirements based on special circumstances. [L 2010, c 89, pt of
§2]

Previous
Vol07_Ch0346-0398
Next